th: ระดับอุณหภูมิของยาง (UTQG): A; B; C; ไม่ได้รับการจัดระดับ; อื่นๆ
cs: Teplotní index pneumatik (UTQG): A; B; C; Nehodnoceno; Jiné
zh-CN: 轮胎温度等级 (UTQG): A; B; C; 未评级; 其他
da: Dæktemperaturvurdering (UTQG): A; B; C; Ikke bedømt; Andet
sl-SI: Ocena odpornosti pnevmatike na temperaturo (UTQG): A; B; C; Brez ocene; Drugo
fr: Indice de température du pneu (UTQG): A; B; C; Non classé; Autre
ro-RO: Indice de temperatură a anvelopei (UTQG): A; B; C; Fără clasificare; Altele
pt-BR: Pneu classificação de temperatura (UTQG): A; B; C; Sem classificação; Outros
nb: Dekktemperaturklassifisering (UTQG): A; B; C; Ikke vurdert; Annet
sv: Däcktemperaturklassificering (UTQG): A; B; C; Ej klassificerad; Övrigt
lt-LT: Padangos temperatūros įvertinimas (UTQG): A; B; C; Neįvertinta; Kita
vi: Chỉ số nhiệt độ lốp (UTQG): A; B; C; Không được đánh giá; Khác
en: Tire temperature rating (UTQG): A; B; C; Not rated; Other
sk-SK: Teplotný rozsah pneumatík (UTQG): A; B; C; Nehodnotené; Iné
pt-PT: Classificação de temperatura dos pneus (UTQG): A; B; C; Não classificado; Outro
es: Índice de temperatura de los neumáticos (UTQG): A; B; C; Sin clasificación; Otro
bg-BG: Температурен индекс на гумата (UTQG): A; B; C; Без рейтинг; Друго
el: Βαθμολογία θερμοκρασίας ελαστικών (UTQG): A; B; C; Χωρίς αξιολόγηση; Άλλο
de: Temperaturklasse des Reifens (UTQG): A; B; C; Nicht bewertet; Sonstige
zh-TW: 輪胎溫度評級 (UTQG): A; B; C; 未評級; 其他
ja: タイヤ温度評価 (UTQG): A; B; C; 評価なし; その他
tr: Lastik sıcaklık derecesi (UTQG): A; B; C; Derecelendirilmemiş; Diğer
nl: Band temperatuurclassificatie (UTQG): A; B; C; Niet beoordeeld; Overige
ru: Температурный рейтинг шины (UTQG): A; B; C; Без рейтинга; Другое
ko: 타이어 온도 등급(UTQG): A; B; C; 등급 없음; 기타
pl: Ocena temperatury opon (UTQG): A; B; C; Brak oceny; Inne
hu: Gumiabroncs hőmérsékleti ellenállási besorolása (UTQG): A; B; C; Nincs besorolva; Egyéb
fi: Renkaan lämpötilaluokitus (UTQG): A; B; C; Ei luokiteltu; Muu
hr-HR: Ocjena temperature guma (UTQG): A; B; C; Nema ocjenu; Ostalo
it: Indice di temperatura degli pneumatici (UTQG): A; B; C; Non classificato; Altro